Washington statutes.
RCW 42.52.530

Additional investigative authority.

In addition to other authority under this chapter, the attorney general may investigate persons not under the jurisdiction of an ethics board whom the attorney general has reason to believe were involved in transactions in violation of this chapter or rules adopted under it.

[ 1994 c 154 s 223.]